Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-751
Joint city and county facilities; cooperation with other governmental agencies; authorization; dual officers and employees.

(1) Any county and any city of the primary class, which is the county seat thereof, shall have the power to join with each other and with other political or governmental subdivisions, agencies, or public corporations whether federal, state, or local, or with any number of combinations thereof, by contract or otherwise in the joint ownership, operation, or performance of any property, facility, power, or function, or in agreements containing the provisions that one or more thereof operate or perform for the other or others. Any such county and any such city shall also have the power to authorize and undertake research, formulate plans, draft and seek the enactment of legislation, take other actions concerning improvement of the relationships between themselves or between each of them and other political or governmental subdivisions, agencies, or public corporations, whether federal, state or local, for the attainment of voluntary cooperation agreements, annexations, transfers of functions to or from such city, or to or from such county, or city-county consolidation or separation, or any other means of accomplishing changes in governmental organization in which such city or such county has an interest. Such city and such county may undertake such efforts alone or in concert with other political or governmental subdivisions, agencies, or public corporations, whether federal, state, or local, or with public or private research or professional organizations. Such city and such county may appropriate and spend money for such purposes.

(2) Any officer or employee, whether elected or appointed, of any county, may also simultaneously be and serve as an officer or employee of any such city of the primary class, referred to in subsection (1) of this section, which is the county seat of the county where such duties are not incompatible. Any officer or employee, whether elected or appointed, of a city of the primary class which is the county seat of a county may also simultaneously be and serve as an officer or employee of the county of which said city is the county seat where such duties are not incompatible; Provided, that this provision shall not apply to or cover the county board of such county or the mayor or members of the city council of such city.

Laws 1957, c. 25, § 1, p. 178.